Hawaii statutes.
§708-893 Use of a computer in the
commission of a separate crime. (1) A person commits the offense of use
of a computer in the commission of a separate crime if the person knowingly
uses a computer to identify, select, solicit, persuade, coerce, entice, induce,
procure, pursue, surveil, contact, harass, annoy, or alarm the victim or
intended victim of the following offenses:

(a) Section 707-726, relating to custodial
interference in the first degree;

(b) Section 707-727, relating to custodial interference
in the second degree;

(c) Section 707-731, relating to sexual assault in
the second degree;

(d) Section 707-732, relating to sexual assault in
the third degree;

(e) Section 707-733, relating to sexual assault in
the fourth degree;

(f) Section 707-751, relating to promoting child
abuse in the second degree;

(g) Section 711-1106, relating to harassment;

(h) Section 711-1106.5, relating to harassment by
stalking; or

(i) Section 712-1215, relating to promoting
pornography for minors.

(2) Use of a computer in the commission of a
separate crime is an offense one class or grade, as the case may be, greater
than the offense facilitated. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a
conviction under this section shall not merge with a conviction for the
separate crime. [L 2001, c 33, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 141, §1; am L 2012, c
192, §1; am L 2016, c 231, §42]

Note

The 2012 amendment is not intended to interfere with First
Amendment rights of free speech and expression of any person affected. L 2012,
c 192, §3.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next